Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1 General Provisions
54-5-130. Counties required to contribute proportionally for construction of highways.

The commissioner has the power, within reasonable discretion, to require of any county where a road or roads are to be built to contribute its fair proportion of the funds necessary to construct the highway, but in no case more than fifty percent (50%) shall be required.

Acts 1919, ch. 149, § 22; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b23; Code 1932, § 3186; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-530; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of statutory provisions as to political corporations or divisions that shall bear cost of establishing or maintaining highway. 2 A.L.R. 746, 123 A.L.R. 1462.

54-5-131. Public hearings.

State highway projects funded totally from state appropriations shall be subject to public hearings only in the following instances:

The commissioner determines that the public interest would be served if a public hearing was held; or

The commissioner determines that the project:

Requires the acquisition of significant amounts of right-of-way; or

Substantially changes the layout or function of connecting roadways or of the project roadway.

The department shall hold the hearings at convenient locations before plans for the project are finally adopted, and shall consider the economic and social effects of the proposed location of the proposed highway, as well as its impact on the environment, and its consistency with the goals and objectives of any urban planning as may have been adopted by the community.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-579; Acts 1980, ch. 516, § 1; 1985, ch. 218, § 1.

54-5-132. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-5-132 (Acts 1949, ch. 52, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3277.1 (Williams, § 3277.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-539), concerning the discontinuation of the collection of tolls, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 597, § 14, effective June 28, 2007.

54-5-133. Eradication and control of noxious weeds.

The commissioner shall adequately eradicate or control, or both, by chemical or other means, noxious weeds growing on state highway rights-of-way whenever areas adjacent to the rights-of-way are determined by the commissioner of agriculture, in accordance with § 43-1-106, to be row crop areas or grassland areas.

Acts 1972, ch. 801, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-578; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2013, ch. 308, § 26.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section which read: “The commissioner shall adequately eradicate or control, or both, by chemical or other means, noxious weeds growing on state highway rights-of-way in the following instances:“(1) Johnson grass along state highway rights-of-way whenever areas adjacent to the rights-of-way are determined by the commissioner of agriculture, in accordance with § 43-1-106, to be row crop areas; and“(2) Canadian thistles along state highway rights-of-way whenever areas adjacent to the rights-of-way are determined by the commissioner of agriculture, in accordance with § 43-1-106, to be grassland areas.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-5-134. Cutting hay along controlled access highway right-of-way.

Residents of the state who derive a significant portion of their annual income by farming may petition the department for permission to cut and bale hay along the rights-of-way of interstate highways located within the state, and other controlled access highway facilities located within the state, whether totally or partially controlled; provided, that the hay is to be used for personal farming purposes and may not be sold.

The commissioner is authorized to grant permission upon individual request.

In order to promote the safety of motorists and persons engaged in cutting and baling activity, the commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the granting of permission and the performance of the cutting and baling activity.

These rules and regulations shall include:

Restrictions on the hours and days during which cutting and baling activity may be performed;

Restrictions on the areas in which cutting and baling activity may be performed; and

Any other reasonable measures designed to minimize the possibility of traffic mishaps resulting from cutting, baling, and hauling of the hay.

The commissioner shall require that any individual granted a cutting permit possess, during the cutting and baling operation, minimum liability insurance in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for bodily injury or death to any one (1) person in a single accident, plus one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for bodily injury or death to two (2) or more persons in a single accident, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for injury to or destruction of property in a single accident.

No fee relative to petitioning for permission or engaging in the cutting and baling activity shall be charged.

Acts 1978, ch. 653, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-585; Acts 1988, ch. 615, § 1.

54-5-135. “Buy America” Act.

No agency or entity of state, county, or municipal government in the state shall purchase any materials used for highway or roadway construction, resurfacing, or maintenance from any foreign government, or any company wholly owned and controlled by a foreign government, regardless of the location of the company, or from any agency of the foreign government or company.

As used in this section, “materials” includes, but is not limited to, asphalt cement, asphalt emulsion, rock, aggregate, liquid and solid additives, sealers and oils.

This section shall not apply:

If the materials are not produced by American companies in sufficient and reasonably available quantities, and are of satisfactory quality; or

If the American materials increase the overall project cost for which these materials are purchased by five percent (5%) more than the overall project cost using materials produced by a foreign government owned company.

Acts 1983, ch. 213, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

54-5-136. Personal property encroachments on rights-of-way.

The department is authorized to remove, store, sell and dispose of personal property encroachments on the rights-of-way of highways under its jurisdiction at the expense of the owner.

If the encroachment presents an immediate danger to the traveling public, the department may remove the encroachment without prior notice to the owner. If the owner's name and address can be ascertained by reasonable inquiry after removal, the department shall give the owner notice, by certified mail, within ten (10) calendar days of removal.

If the encroachment does not present an immediate danger to the traveling public and the owner's name and address can be ascertained by reasonable inquiry, the department shall give the owner ten (10) calendar days' notice, by certified mail, of its intent to remove the encroachment at the owner's expense. The ten-day period shall run from the fourth day after the mailing of the notice. Upon expiration of that period, the department may remove the encroachment.

The owner of personal property encroaching on the right-of-way of a highway under the jurisdiction of the department shall be liable for any damages caused to the department or to third parties by the encroaching property.

The department does not have a duty to find or remove personal property encroachments on the rights-of-way under its jurisdiction. If the department receives actual notice that an encroachment presents a hazard to those traveling on the adjacent roadway, the department shall, if the owner's name and address can be ascertained by reasonable inquiry, notify the owner of the property and instruct the property owner to remove the encroachment immediately. The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested. After notice, or if unable to locate the owner's name and address after reasonable inquiry, the department may remove the encroachment pursuant to subdivision (a)(1).

If removed property is declared by the department to have value to the public and is capable of transport by ordinary means, it shall be stored on department property for thirty (30) days, during which time the owner may claim the property after paying related expenses incurred by the department.

If the property is not so claimed, then it shall be offered for sale to the public after notice posted in the county courthouse of the county in which the property was located prior to removal.

The owner shall be entitled to the proceeds of any sale, less costs, if claimed within one (1) year following the sale; otherwise, the proceeds shall vest in the department and become part of the highway fund to defray expenses in carrying out this section.

If removed property is declared to have no value to the public or not purchased at public sale, or the property is incapable of removal by ordinary means, it shall vest in the department to be disposed of as it determines.

Acts 1984, ch. 791, § 1; 2002, ch. 811, § 1.

Cross-References. Unclaimed or abandoned vehicles, title 55, ch. 16.

Attorney General Opinions. Neither the Department of Transportation nor any other agency of state or local government has express authority to grant a citizen permission to erect a cross or similar memorial upon a right-of-way of a state or interstate highway, but the Department does have authority to remove and dispose of crosses and similar memorials, that have been erected or placed upon the right-of-way of a state or interstate highway, OAG 05-016 (2/03/05).

The Tennessee department of transportation has express authority to remove and dispose of personal property encroachments — including crosses and similar materials — upon the rights-of-way of highways under its jurisdiction, OAG 06-157 (10/9/06).

Cited: Tennessee Realty Dev., Inc. v. State Dep't of Transportation, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 774 (Tenn. Ct. App. Dec. 29, 2008).

54-5-137. Elimination of hazardous right-of-way conditions.

It is the intent of the department to make reasonable efforts to eliminate conditions on highway rights-of-way that are hazardous to an adjoining landowner's health, welfare and safety.

Acts 1986, ch. 806, § 1.

54-5-138. Contracts for mowing rights-of-way, and litter collection.

Notwithstanding other law to the contrary, for contracts for the mowing of rights-of-way and litter collection, or either of them, bids may be accompanied by letters of credit in the amount of five percent (5%) of the bid, in lieu of proper bonds, to guarantee execution of the contract.

All contractors with whom contracts are made for the mowing of rights-of-way and litter collection, or either of them, may provide, in lieu of bonds, letters of credit guaranteeing the department alone the faithful discharge of the contract, and for no other reason.

Acts 1987, ch. 296, § 1; 2004, ch. 605, § 6.

54-5-139. Maintenance contracts with counties.

The commissioner may enter into a contract with a qualified county to perform maintenance activities upon the rights-of-way of state highways located outside municipalities and metropolitan governments.

The department of transportation shall reimburse the county on an actual cost basis.

Acts 1988, ch. 470, § 1.

54-5-140. Improvements by local governments — Approval — Maintenance.

Cities, counties and metropolitan governments are authorized, within their respective jurisdictions, to make improvements to existing highways on the system of state highways, or to construct additions to the system, with the approval of the commissioner. The work may be accomplished by qualified persons provided by the city, county, or metropolitan government, or by contracts with qualified contractors.

When the work provided for in subsection (a) is undertaken, the commissioner shall have the authority to approve the plans and specifications for conformity to state standards. Following completion of the construction in conformity with the plans and specifications, the department shall assume responsibility for the maintenance of the highways.

Acts 1988, ch. 512, § 1.

54-5-141. Highway rights-of-way — Retention for scenic or environmental purposes.

The department shall consider whether highway rights-of-way are suitable for retention in order to restore, preserve, or improve the scenic beauty and environmental quality adjacent to the highway, prior to declaring the rights-of-way surplus and conveying them for uses other than highways. The department is encouraged to retain, rather than dispose of, its interests in these rights-of-way.

Acts 1991, ch. 295, § 1.

54-5-142. Designation of bicycle routes.

The commissioner may designate and appropriately mark on appropriate state highways, or portions of state highways, routes for the use of bicycles.

Acts 1994, ch. 909, § 1.

Cross-References. Designation of bicycle routes, §§ 54-5-211, 54-10-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Pedestrian and vehicular use of marked bicycle lanes. OAG 14-13, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (1/23/14).

54-5-143. Welcome signs.

The department of transportation is directed to include the language “The Volunteer State” on all highway signs welcoming visitors to the state. The language shall be added to the signs whenever the signs are replaced or modified for another purpose.

Notwithstanding any rule, regulation or law to the contrary, a city, county or metropolitan “welcome” sign erected on a state right-of-way prior to February 14, 1994, shall not be required to be removed, relocated or dismantled by the department of transportation. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a city, county or metropolitan government from entering into an agreement with the department to remove, relocate or dismantle a “welcome” sign.

Acts 1995, ch. 476, § 1; 1999, ch. 450, § 4; T.C.A. § 54-5-144.

54-5-144. Memorial to fallen Tennessee national guardsman.

Any segment or structure named on State Route 840, the “Tennessee National Guard Parkway” as designated by chapter 35 of the Public Acts of 2005, shall be dedicated as a memorial to a fallen Tennessee national guardsman.

Acts 2010, ch. 1048, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1048, § 1 provided that, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, it is the intent of the general assembly to name an appropriate interchange, bridge or bridges on State Route 840 (Tennessee National Guard Parkway) to honor the memory of Chief Warrant Officer 2 Billie Jean Grinder, Troop C 1/230th Air Calvary, Tennessee army national guard, a valiant soldier who gave her life in the line of duty while serving in Iraq.

Acts 2010, ch. 1048, § 8 provided that, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, it is the intent of the general assembly to name an appropriate interchange, bridge or bridges on State Route 840 (Tennessee National Guard Parkway) to honor the memory of Captain Marcus Ray Alford, Tennessee Army National Guard, a valiant soldier who gave his life in the line of duty while serving in Iraq.

Acts 2010, ch. 1048, § 11 provided that, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, it is the intent of the general assembly to name an appropriate interchange, bridge or bridges on State Route 840 (Tennessee National Guard Parkway) to honor the memory of Staff Sergeant Michael Wayne Tinsley, Sr., Tennessee army national guard, a valiant soldier who gave his life in the line of duty while awaiting deployment to Iraq.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 1048, § 16. June 21, 2010.

54-5-145. Definition of driver under the influence — Limitation of liability for accidents in road construction zones.

In this subsection (a), “driver under the influence” means a driver who was under the influence of any intoxicant, marijuana, narcotic drug, or drug producing stimulating effects on the central nervous system, or the alcohol concentration in such person's blood or breath was eight-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or more in violation of title 55, chapter 10, part 4.

In a civil action for the death of or injury to a person, or for damage to property, against the department of transportation or its agents, consultants, or contractors for work performed on a highway, road, street, bridge, or other transportation facility when the death, injury, or damage resulted from a motor vehicle crash within a construction zone in which the driver of one (1) of the vehicles was under the influence as defined in subdivision (a)(1), or one (1) of the drivers was convicted of reckless driving in violation of § 55-10-205, and the driver's reckless driving or driving under the influence was a cause in fact and proximate cause of the accident, then it is presumed that the department of transportation, its agents, consultants, or contractors, are not the cause in fact and proximate cause of the accident and any death, injury, or damage resulting from the accident. This presumption can only be overcome if the malicious, intentional, fraudulent or reckless misconduct of the department of transportation, or of its agents, consultants, or contractors, was a proximate cause of such person's death, injury, or damage.

A contractor who constructs, maintains, or repairs a highway, road, street, bridge, or other transportation facility for the department of transportation is not liable to a claimant for personal injury, property damage, or death arising from the performance of such construction, maintenance, or repair if, at the time of the personal injury, property damage, or death, the contractor was in compliance with contract documents material to the condition that was the proximate cause of the personal injury, property damage, or death.

The limitation on liability contained in this subsection (b) does not apply when a proximate cause of the personal injury, property damage, or death is a latent condition, defect, error, or omission that was created by the contractor and not a defect, error, or omission in the contract documents; or when the proximate cause of the personal injury, property damage, or death was the contractor's failure to perform, update, or comply with the maintenance of traffic safety plan as required by the contract documents.

The contractor has a duty to provide the department of transportation with written notice of any apparent error or omission in the contract documents, and nothing in this subsection (b) shall be interpreted or construed as relieving the contractor of any obligation to provide the department of transportation with written notice of any apparent error or omission in the contract documents.

Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be interpreted or construed to alter or affect any claim of the department of transportation against such contractor.

This subsection (b) does not affect any claim of any entity against such contractor, which claim is associated with such entity's facilities on or in department of transportation roads or other transportation facilities.

In all cases involving personal injury, property damage, or death, a person or entity who contracts to prepare or provide engineering plans for the construction or repair of a highway, road, street, bridge, or other transportation facility for the department of transportation shall be presumed to have prepared such engineering plans using the degree of care and skill ordinarily exercised by other engineers in the field under similar conditions and in similar localities and with due regard for acceptable engineering standards and principles if the engineering plans conformed to the department of transportation's design standards material to the condition or defect that was the proximate cause of the personal injury, property damage, or death.

This presumption can be overcome only upon a showing of the person's or entity's gross negligence in the preparation of the engineering plans and shall not be interpreted or construed to alter or affect any claim of the department of transportation against such person or entity.

The limitation on liability contained in this subsection (c) shall not apply to any hidden or undiscoverable condition created by the engineer.

This subsection (c) does not affect any claim of any entity against such engineer or engineering firm, which claim is associated with such entity's facilities on or in department of transportation roads or other transportation facilities.

The engineer has a duty to provide the department of transportation with written notice of any apparent error or omission in the department of transportation's design standards, and nothing in this subsection (c) shall be interpreted or construed as relieving the engineer of any obligation to provide the department of transportation with written notice of any apparent error or omission in the department of transportation's design standards.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be interpreted or construed to alter or affect any claim the department of transportation has against such engineer.

In any civil action for death, injury, or damages against the department of transportation or its agents, consultants, engineers, or contractors for work performed on a highway, road, street, bridge, or other transportation facility, if the department, its agents, consultants, engineers, or contractors are immune from liability pursuant to this section or are not parties to the litigation, they may not be named on the jury verdict form or be found to be at fault or responsible for the injury, death, or damage that gave rise to the damages.

Acts 2011, ch. 480, § 1; 2013, ch. 154, § 45.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 480, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all contracts to which the act applies entered into, or injuries to which the act applies occurring, on or after July 1, 2011.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “title 55, chapter 10, part 4” for “§§ 55-10-401 — 55-10-404” at the end of (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 480, § 2. July 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, ch. 154, § 57. July 1, 2013.